Washington statutes.
RCW 19.138.160

Nonresident seller of travel—Director as attorney if none appointed—Service of process—Notice.

(1) A nonresident seller of travel soliciting business or selling travel in the state of Washington, by mail, telephone, or otherwise, either directly or indirectly, is deemed, absent any other appointment, to have appointed the director to be the seller of travel's true and lawful attorney upon whom may be served any legal process against that nonresident arising or growing out of a transaction involving travel services or the sale of travel-related benefits. That solicitation signifies the nonresident's agreement that process against the nonresident that is served as provided in this chapter is of the same legal force and validity as if served personally on the nonresident seller of travel.

(2) Service of process upon a nonresident seller of travel shall be made by leaving a copy of the process with the director. The fee for the service of process shall be determined by the director by rule. That service is sufficient service upon the nonresident if the plaintiff or plaintiff's attorney of record sends notice of the service and a copy of the process by certified mail before service or immediately after service to the defendant at the address given by the nonresident in a solicitation furnished by the nonresident, and the sender's post office receipt of sending and the plaintiff's or plaintiff's attorney's affidavit of compliance with this section are returned with the process in accordance with Washington superior court civil rules. Notwithstanding the foregoing requirements, however, once service has been made on the director as provided in this section, in the event of failure to comply with the requirement of notice to the nonresident, the court may order that notice be given that will be sufficient to apprise the nonresident.

[ 2001 c 44 s 5; 1994 c 237 s 14.]